Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB266.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1627.1. Limitations on Contributions.--(a) Contributions made by an individual may not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in aggregate per candidate for all offices in a calendar year . (b) Contributions made by a political action committee may 12345678910111213141516171819202122 not exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) in aggregate per candidate for all offices in a calendar year.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0266PN0211 - 2 - 123